Tennessee, session 114, SB1443.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 120 of the Private Acts of 1915, as amended and rewritten by
Chapter 21 of the Private Acts of 2009, Chapter 44 of the Private Acts of 2018, Chapter 3 of the
Private Acts of 2019, and any other acts amendatory thereto, is amended by deleting Sections
12-14 and substituting instead:
SECTION 12.
The board may appoint a Town Administrator who shall be under the control and
direction of the board. The Town Administrator shall report and be responsible to the
board. The board may, by ordinance, require the Town Administrator to perform any or
all the following duties:
(1) Administer the business of the Town;
(2) Make recommendations to the board for improving the quality and
quantity of public services to be rendered by the officers and employees to the
inhabitants of the Town;
(3) Keep the board fully advised as to the conditions and needs of the
Town;
(4) Report to the board the condition of all property, real and personal,
owned by the Town and recommend repairs or replacements as needed;
(5) Recommend to the board and suggest the priority of programs or
projects involving public works or public improvements that should be undertaken
by the Town;
SB1443
001060
- 1 -

(6) Have general supervision of all the employees of the Town and see
that the ordinances and provisions of the charter are observed;
(7) Recommend specific personnel positions, as may be required for the
needs and operations of the Town, and propose personnel policies and
procedures for approval of the board; and
(8) Perform such other duties as may from time to time be designated or
required by the board.
The Town government shall be organized into such departments and offices as
shall be provided by ordinance. The Town Administrator may determine by executive
action the functions and duties of all departments and offices. The Town Administrator
may establish, abolish, merge, or consolidate offices, positions of employment, and
departments; may provide that the same person shall fill any number of offices and
positions of employment; and may transfer or change the functions and duties of offices,
positions of employment, and departments. The appointment and promotion of
employees of the Town of Mason shall be on the basis of merit, considering technical
knowledge required to perform satisfactorily the work, experience in the particular or
similar line of work, and administrative or supervisory qualifications. The Town
Administrator shall establish a system of personnel administration to provide for the
appointment of all employees of the Town of Mason. The Town Administrator, with
ratification of the majority of the Board, shall appoint the Town Attorney, department
heads, and such other positions as the Town Administrator shall deem necessary for the
proper and efficient administration of government for the Town of Mason.
SECTION 13. All contracts and bonds of the corporation shall be signed by the
Town Administrator and countersigned by the Recorder under the seal of the corporation
upon authority given by the Board at one of its meetings. All disbursements shall be
made by checks signed by the Town Recorder and by the Town Administrator. The
- 2 - 001060

Board may designate other officers to sign such checks in the absence or disability of
the Town Administrator or Town Recorder.
SECTION 14. The Mayor, as a member of the board, may make motions and
shall have a vote on all matters coming before the board.
SECTION 2. Chapter 120 of the Private Acts of 1915, as amended and rewritten by
Chapter 21 of the Private Acts of 2009, Chapter 44 of the Private Acts of 2018, and any other
acts amendatory thereto, is amended by deleting the second paragraph of Section 19 and
substituting instead:
Ordinances shall be signed by the Mayor, although the Mayor's signature is not required
for the ordinance to take effect. Such ordinances shall be immediately taken charge of by the
Town Recorder, numbered, placed in an ordinance book, and there authenticated by the
signature of the Town Recorder and filed and preserved.
SECTION 3. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of the Town of Mason. Its approval or nonapproval shall be proclaimed
by the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 4. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 3.
- 3 - 001060